Tennessee, session 114, HB0378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-103(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) A commissioned reserve deputy sheriff or commissioned reserve or auxiliary
police officer receiving compensation for services as a guard, patrol, or watchperson
under a contract with a private business that is properly licensed by the state;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0378
001865
- 1 -